Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2059.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "board" and "inmate" in section 102 of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this title shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." [The] Except as provided for in Chapter 51 (relating to segregated confinement), the Pennsylvania Parole Board.* * *"Inmate." [A] Except as provided for in Chapter 51, a person 12345678910111213141516171819 committed to a term of imprisonment or otherwise confined under the custody of the Commonwealth or a county in a correctional institution in accordance with law.* * *Section 2. Title 61 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 51SEGREGATED CONFINEMENTSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Standards and ProceduresC. Oversight and EnforcementD. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.5101. Scope of chapter.5102. Definitions.§ 5101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to standards and procedures involv ing segregated confinement of inmates in correctional facilities.§ 5102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Segregated Confinement Hearing Review Board established under section 5132(a) (relating to Segregated Confinement Hearing Review Board)."Chief administrator." As follows:(1) The warden, superintendent or other officer in charge of a correctional facility.20250HB2059PN2643 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term includes a designee of the warden, superintendent or other officer in charge of a correctional facility."Correctional facility." Any of the following:(1) A correctional institution.(2) A facility that confines a child in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).(3) An institution that detains inmates in accordance with Chapter 71 (relating to interstate compacts) or an intergovernmental service agreement or other contract with a Federal, State or county agency, including United States Immigrations and Customs Enforcement."Disability." A physical, mental or medical impairment resulting from any anatomical, physiological, genetic or neurological condition that prevents the exercise of normal bodily functions."Emergency segregated confinement." The segregated confinement of an inmate if there is reasonable cause to believe that the confinement is necessary for reducing a substantial risk of imminent serious harm to the inmate or other individuals."Inmate." An individual confined in a correctional facility."Member of a vulnerable population." An inmate who meets any of the following conditions:(1) Is less than 21 years of age.(2) Is 55 years of age or older.(3) Is pregnant or in the postpartum recovery period.(4) Has recently suffered a miscarriage or terminated a pregnancy.(5) Identifies as or is perceived to be lesbian, gay, 20250HB2059PN2643 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bisexual, transgender, intersex or gender nonconforming.(6) Is a person with a disability."Person with a disability." An individual who has a disability and meets any of the following conditions:(1) Has a mental health diagnosis.(2) Is, or has been within the past year, on the mental health caseload or roster or has, or had within the past year, a mental health rating or classification.(3) Has been housed within a mental health unit within a correctional facility.(4) Has, or had within the past year, an intellectual, developmental or cognitive diagnosis.(5) Has, or had within the past year, a physical disability diagnosis or mobility impairment diagnosis.(6) Has a sensory disability diagnosis.(7) Has a traumatic brain injury or organic brain syndrome.(8) Is p regnant, in the postpartum recovery period, experiencing a miscarriage or in the process of terminating a pregnancy.(9) Is caring for the individual's child while in a correctional facility in accordance with State law."Postpartum recovery period." The 12-week period, or longer if determined medically necessary, after giving birth to a child."Representative." As follows:(1) An individual representing the interests of an inmate during a hearing under section 5113 (relating to hearing).(2) The term includes:20250HB2059PN2643 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Legal counsel.(ii) A law student.(iii) A paralegal.(iv) An other inmate. "Segregated confinement." As follows:(1) The confinement of an inmate in a cell or similarly confined holding or living space within a correctional facility, alone or with other individuals for more than 17 hours per day, for purposes other than providing medical or mental health treatment or managing a facility-wide emergency at the correctional facility.(2) The term includes:(i) A partial lockdown of a correctional facility.(ii) Medical isolation of an inmate.(iii) Protective custody for an inmate.SUBCHAPTER BSTANDARDS AND PROCEDURESSec.5111. Placement generally.5112. Consent.5113. Hearing.5114. Review.5115. Prohibitions.5116. Conditions of cells.5117. Out-of-cell time.5118. Partial lockdown.5119. Emergency segregated confinement.5120. Monitoring of inmates.5121. Use of segregated confinement pending investigation.5122. Documentation.20250HB2059PN2643 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5123. Alternative disciplinary measures.5124. Rehabilitation after release from segregated confinement.§ 5111. Placement generally.(a) Authorization.--(1) The chief administrator shall determine whether an inmate should be placed in segregated confinement.(2) An inmate may not remain or be placed in segregated confinement if the chief administrator determines that the inmate no longer meets the standards for segregated confinement under this chapter.(b) Process.--Placement in segregated confinement shall be in accordance with this chapter.§ 5112. Consent.(a) Protective custody.-- If the chief administrator determines that an inmate should be placed in protective custody as part of segregated confinement, in the absence of a hearing under section 5113 (relating to hearing), the correctional facility may place the inmate in protective custody only if the inmate gives informed, voluntary and written consent to the placement to the chief administrator.(b) Member of vulnerable population.--In the absence of a hearing under section 5113, a correctional facility may not place in segregated confinement an inmate who is a member of a vulnerable population unless the inmate gives informed, voluntary and written consent to the placement to the chief administrator.§ 5113. Hearing.(a) General requirements.--In the absence of consent under section 5112 (relating to consent), an inmate may be held in segregated confinement only if, within 72 hours of the inmate's 20250HB2059PN2643 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 placement in segregated confinement, an initial hearing on the segregated confinement is conducted, which provides the inmate with a timely, fair and meaningful opportunity to contest the segregated confinement.(b) Appearance by inmate.--In the absence of exceptional circumstances, unavoidable delays or postponements, an inmate shall be permitted to appear at the hearing under subsection (a). The following apply:(1) If the inmate refuses to attend the hearing, the hearing shall be videotaped and made part of the hearing record.(2) If the inmate is excluded or removed from the hearing because it is determined that the inmate's presence will jeopardize the safety of the inmate or other individuals or the security of the correctional facility, the basis for the exclusion must be documented in the hearing record.(c) Conduct of hearing.--For a hearing under this section:(1) An independent hearing official shall conduct the hearing.(2) An inmate shall be entitled to have a representative participate at the hearing. (3) Along with timely notice of the hearing, the inmate shall be provided with a written statement of the purpose of the hearing and the segregated confinement.(4) An inmate, or the representative of the inmate, shall have the right during the hearing to:(i) Provide an opening and closing statement.(ii) Call and question witnesses.(iii) Cross-examine witnesses.(iv) Present evidence.20250HB2059PN2643 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Audio recordings of the hearing shall be made and provided to the inmate and the representative.(6) An inmate may not be placed in segregated confinement on the basis of confidential information that has not been provided to the inmate or otherwise presented at the hearing.(d) Disciplinary hearing.--(1) If a disciplinary hearing may result in placement in segregated confinement for an inmate, the inmate and representative shall be provided, as soon as possible, but not later than 48 hours prior to the commencement of the disciplinary hearing, notice of the hearing and all evidence relevant to the incident and the alleged misconduct by the inmate, including:(i) Any official misconduct report in the possession of the correctional facility.(ii) P otentially exculpatory evidence. (iii) The use of force or extraordinary occurrence reports concerning the alleged misconduct.(iv) Memoranda and correspondence to and from the correctional facility regarding the alleged misconduct.(v) Medical records related to the incident.(vi) Related contraband receipts.(vii) Other written materials regarding the alleged misconduct.(viii) Related photographs.(ix) Audio and video recordings of or relating to the alleged misconduct.(2) A correctional facility may not place an inmate in segregated confinement as a result of the disciplinary 20250HB2059PN2643 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hearing under this subsection unless:(i) The inmate has been found guilty, by clear and convincing evidence, of any of the following:(A) Causing or attempting to cause serious physical injury or death to another individual.(B) Compelling or attempting to compel another individual, by force or by threat of force, to engage in a sexual act.(C) Leading or organizing a riot, insurrection or other similarly serious disturbance that results in the taking of a hostage, major property damage or physical harm to another individual.(D) Procuring a deadly weapon that poses a serious threat of violence within the correctional facility.(E) Escaping, attempting to escape or facilitating an escape from a correctional facility or escaping or attempting to escape while under supervision outside the correctional facility. The following apply:(I) For the purposes of this clause, "attempting to escape" shall only be determined to have occurred if there is a clear finding that the inmate had the intent to cause a serious disturbance or escape and completed significant acts in the advancement of the attempt to create a serious disturbance or escape.(II) Evidence of withdrawal or abandonment of a plan to cause a serious disturbance or escape shall negate a finding of intent.20250HB2059PN2643 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The chief administrator documents in writing that:(A) The acts committed by the inmate were dangerous enough to warrant the removal of the inmate from the general population of the correctional facility.(B) The inmate presents a significant risk of imminent serious physical injury to the inmate, other inmates, staff or other individuals.§ 5114. Review.If an inmate remains in segregated confinement, a review shall be conducted at least every 15 days following the hearing under section 5113 (relating to hearing).§ 5115. Prohibitions.(a) Member of vulnerable population.--(1) A correctional facility may not place an inmate in segregated confinement due solely on the basis that the inmate is a member of a vulnerable population. (2) If an inmate is a member of a vulnerable population because the inmate is less than 21 years of age, a correctional facility may not place the inmate in segregated confinement, or otherwise discipline the inmate, because the inmate refuses treatment or medication, engages in self-harm or threatens self-harm.(3) If an inmate is a member of a vulnerable population because the inmate is 55 years of age or older, pregnant, in the postpartum recovery period or has recently suffered a miscarriage or terminated a pregnancy and would otherwise be placed in segregated confinement by a correctional facility, the correctional facility may not place the inmate in 20250HB2059PN2643 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 segregated confinement but shall instead place the inmate in a specialized unit as designated by the secretary.(b) Duration.--An inmate may not remain in segregated confinement for more than:(1) 15 consecutive days. (2) 45 days in a 180-day period.(c) Risk.--A correctional facility may not place an inmate in segregated confinement w ith another inmate or group of inmates if there is reasonable cause to believe that harm, harassment, intimidation, extortion or other physical or emotional abuse will result toward the inmate.(d) Basis for placement.--An inmate may not be placed in segregated confinement based upon the same act or incident that was previously used as the impetus for the placement in segregate confinement.(e) Limitations.--A correctional facility may not impose on an inmate in segregated confinement any limitation on services, treatment or basic needs, including clothing, food, hygiene, sanitation, health care and bedding.(f) Diet.--A correctional facility may not impose restricted diets or any other change in diet for an inmate in segregated confinement.(g) Representation.-- An inmate may not be denied access to the counsel of a representative while in segregated confinement.(h) Restraints.--(1) Restraints may not be used on inmates in segregated confinement unless an individualized assessment is made and submitted at the time of, or immediately following, alleged misconduct by the inmate. The assessment must indicate that restraints are required for the inmate because of significant 20250HB2059PN2643 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and unreasonable risk of imminent serious physical injury to the inmate, other inmates, staff or other individuals.(2) If restraints are used, the least restrictive form of restraints shall be used.(3) Restraints may not be used on an inmate for longer than necessary to abate imminent harm.§ 5116. Conditions of cells. Cells or other holding or living spaces used for segregated confinement must be properly ventilated, appropriately lit, temperature-monitored, clean and equipped with properly functioning sanitary fixtures.§ 5117. Out-of-cell time.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (c), for an inmate in segregated confinement, a correctional facility:(1) Shall provide the inmate at least four hours of congregate out-of-cell time per day, which:(i) Must include at least two hours per day for recreation, one hour of which shall be offered as outdoor recreation time.(ii) May include peer-led programs, time in a day room or out-of-cell recreation area with other people, congregate meals, volunteer programs or other activities.(2) If the inmate is a person with a disability:(i) Shall provide the inmate at least seven hours of daily out-of-cell time in a group setting with other individuals in the same shared physical space without physical barriers.(ii) M ay provide the inmate access to staff-based programming and contact with persons other than correctional facility staff in a manner appropriate to 20250HB2059PN2643 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the medical needs of the inmate.(b) Request to limit or deny.--(1) The chief administrator may submit to the secretary a request to limit or deny the out-of-cell time under subsection (a).(2) The request under paragraph (1) must be a specific, nongeneralized narrative explanation of the reasons why the out-of-cell time should be limited or denied, based on how the inmate poses an extraordinary and unacceptable risk of imminent physical harm to the safety or security of the inmate, other inmates, staff or other individuals.(c) Exception.--Subsection (a) does not apply if the secretary approves, in whole or in part, the request under subsection (b), in which case the correctional facility shall make any approved adjustment to the out-of-cell time, which may include having the out-of-cell time take place in a smaller group setting or only with therapeutic staff.(d) Program participation and work assignments.--For out-of-cell time for an inmate during segregated confinement:(1) A correctional facility shall offer the inmate educational and rehabilitative programming led by program or therapeutic staff, comparable to the programming offered to inmates in the general population.(2) The inmate shall have access to programs and work assignments comparable to core programs and types of work assignments for inmates in the general population.(3) A correctional facility may not deny the inmate the ability to complete programming required for release as the result of placement in segregated confinement.(4) Time spent on housekeeping or cleaning or on paid 20250HB2059PN2643 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 work assignment shall not be considered out-of-cell time.§ 5118. Partial lockdown.(a) Authorization.--A correctional facility may place an inmate in segregated confinement during a partial lockdown at the correctional facility if the chief administrator determines that the partial lockdown is required to ensure the safety of inmates or other individuals.(b) Documentation.--During a partial lockdown under this section, the chief administrator shall document the specific reasons for the partial lockdown and why less restrictive interventions were insufficient to accomplish the safety goals of the correctional facility.(c) Duration.--(1) A partial lockdown under this section may not exceed:(i) A continuous duration of 24 hours.(ii) Subject to paragraph (2), a maximum of 48 hours within any seven-day period.(2) The chief administrator may request authorization from the secretary to exceed the requirement under paragraph (1)(ii) by providing the secretary with the reason for the need to exceed the requirement. If the secretary provides the authorization, the secretary shall, within 24 hours:(i) Post the authorization on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department, along with the reasons for the request and authorization.(ii) Provide notice of the authorization to the General Assembly, along with the reasons for the request and authorization.§ 5119. Emergency segregated confinement.20250HB2059PN2643 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authorization.--If, upon personal examination of an i nmate, a physician or other qualified medical professional determines that there is a need to place the inmate in emergency segregated confinement, including medical isolation, the correctional facility may place the inmate in emergency segregated confinement in accordance with this section.(b) Length of confinement.--An inmate may not be held in emergency segregated confinement for more than 24 hours.(c) Evaluations and examinations.--(1) Within two hours of the placement of an inmate in emergency segregated confinement, a member of the medical staff at the correctional facility shall conduct an initial medical and mental health evaluation of the inmate.(2) Within 24 hours of the placement of an inmate in emergency segregated confinement, a member of the medical staff at the correctional facility shall conduct a personal and comprehensive medical and mental health evaluation of the inmate.(3) In the case of the emergency segregated confinement of an inmate at a county correctional institution:(i) Within 12 hours of the confinement, a member of the medical staff at the county correctional institution shall conduct a preliminary examination of the inmate.(ii) Within 48 hours of the confinement, a member of the medical staff at the county correctional institution shall conduct a comprehensive medical and mental health evaluation of the inmate.(4) The member of the medical staff who conducted the evaluation or examination under this subsection shall, upon completion of the evaluation or examination, provide a report 20250HB2059PN2643 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the evaluation or examination to the chief administrator.(d) Clinical review.--A personalized clinical review shall be conducted on an inmate in emergency segregated confinement at least every six hours and as clinically indicated.(e) Mental health.--I f the purpose of the emergency segregated confinement of an inmate is related to the mental health of the inmate, the inmate shall be placed in a mental health unit as designated by the secretary or, in the case of a county correctional institution, in an area designated for the treatment of mental health.§ 5120. Monitoring of inmates. Following placement of an inmate in segregated confinement, a correctional facility shall:(1) Within 12 hours of the placement, notify the medical or mental health staff of the correctional facility in writing of the placement.(2) Ensure that the inmate receives wellness checks at least twice per hour during the placement.(3) Unless a medical or mental health staff recommends more frequent checks, monitor an inmate at least every 15 minutes if the inmate is demonstrating unusual behavior or has indicated suicidality or self-harm.§ 5121. Use of segregated confinement pending investigation.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), an inmate may not be placed in segregated confinement pending investigation of alleged misconduct by the inmate or other alleged conduct that may result in disciplinary action against the inmate.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) does not apply if:(1) The chief administrator determines that the presence 20250HB2059PN2643 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the inmate in the general population poses a danger to the inmate, other inmates, staff or other individuals. In making a determination under this paragraph, the chief administrator shall consider the seriousness of the alleged conduct, including whether the alleged conduct involved violence or an escape or posed a threat to the correctional facility's safety by encouraging other inmates to engage in misconduct.(2) The chief administrator has approved the segregated placement based on exigent or emergency circumstances.(c) Review.--The placement of an inmate in accordance with subsection (b) shall be reviewed within 24 hours by a supervisory employee who was not involved in the initial decision to place the inmate in segregated confinement.(d) Release.--An inmate who has been placed in segregated confinement in accordance with subsection (b) shall be considered for release to the general population if the inmate demonstrates good behavior while confined. If, in a disciplinary hearing, the inmate is found guilty of misconduct, the inmate's good behavior shall be considered in determining the appropriate penalty.§ 5122. Documentation.(a) Requirement.--A correctional facility shall document each time an inmate placed in segregated confinement or any other type of confinement aside from the general population.(b) Contents.--The documentation under this section must include:(1) The facts and circumstances that led to placing the inmate into segregated confinement.(2) The date and time the inmate was placed in segregated confinement.20250HB2059PN2643 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A clear and consistent log of the time that the inmate spent out-of-cell time while in segregated confinement or any other type of confinement that is not the general population.§ 5123. Alternative disciplinary measures.(a) Authorization.--A correctional facility shall:(1) Implement alternative disciplinary measures to segregated confinement.(2) Develop a hierarchy of the use of alternative disciplinary measures to segregated confinement in cases involving disciplinary measures.(3) Limit the use of segregated confinement to only those incidents in which an alternative disciplinary measure would not be effective or appropriate.(b) Examples.--An alternative disciplinary measure for an inmate includes:(1) The limitation of contact visits for the inmate.(2) The restriction of visitors to only the immediate family of the inmate.(3) The loss of work opportunities for the inmate.(4) The assignment of additional unpaid work duties for the inmate, but for not more than 14 days.(5) The loss of telephone, entertainment or yard time privileges for the inmate, but for not more than 14 days.(6) The loss of commissary privileges for the inmate, but for not more than 14 days.(7) The confinement of the inmate to the inmate's own cell in the general population area, but for not more than 20 hours per day.(8) A reprimand or warning to the inmate.20250HB2059PN2643 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Other placement for certain individuals.--An inmate who is a member of a vulnerable population because the inmate is less than 21 years of age and who would otherwise be placed in segregated confinement shall be screened by a clinician at the correctional facility or an appropriate screening service and, if found to meet the standards of civil commitment, shall be placed in a specialized unit, as designated by the secretary, or civilly committed to the least restrictive appropriate short-term care or psychiatric facility designated by the Department of Human Services.§ 5124. Rehabilitation after release from segregated confinement.(a) Duty of correctional facility.--A correctional facility shall be responsible for the rehabilitation and reclamation of an inmate released from segregated confinement to ensure that the inmate has not sustained any lasting physical, mental or psychological injury or damage.(b) Rights of inmate.--Upon release from segregated confinement, an inmate shall:(1) Receive weekly meetings with a licensed mental health professional and a certified peer specialist.(2) Have access to classes and educational materials.(3) Have access to familial and outside contact.(4) Have access to supports or resources necessary for recovery, as determined by a licensed mental health professional.SUBCHAPTER COVERSIGHT AND ENFORCEMENTSec.5131. Independent investigator.20250HB2059PN2643 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5132. Segregated Confinement Hearing Review Board.5133. Duties of department.5134. Additional relief.§ 5131. Independent investigator.(a) Authorization.--The department shall coordinate with the Pennsylvania Prison Society, or its successor, to designat e an independent investigator to monitor each correctional facility to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.(b) Duties.--The independent investigator shall:(1) Conduct interviews with inmates in segregated confinement and report any abuse to the department.(2) Review documents regarding inmates necessary to determine the implementation of segregated confinement.(c) Use of information.--Information gathered under subsection (b) may be used in a misconduct hearing conducted in accordance with section 5132 (relating to Segregated Confinement H earing Review Board ). § 5132. Segregated Confinement Hearing Review Board.(a) Establishment and purpose.--The Segregated Confinement Hearing Review Board is established in the department to conduct hearings regarding alleged misconduct that occurs against inmates during segregated confinement at correctional facilities.(b) Members.--The board shall consist of the following:(1) A licensed psychologist or psychiatrist.(2) A licensed mental health professional with a counseling background.(3) A licensed social worker.(c) Conduct of hearing.--The following apply to a hearing by the board:20250HB2059PN2643 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Unless prohibited by the board for cause shown, the inmate and correctional facility may call and cross-examine witnesses during the hearing.(2) The inmate shall be entitled to have a representative participate at the hearing.(3) The inmate shall be given access to video evidence from the correctional facility no later than 24 hours before the commencement of the hearing.(d) Relief.--If the board finds that misconduct occurred during segregated confinement by the correctional facility, the correctional facility shall immediately release the inmate from segregated confinement.§ 5133. Duties of department.(a) Authorization.--The department shall implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.(b) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, which must include the following, in accordance with this chapter:(1) A process to review the placement of inmates in segregated confinement, including the circumstances leading to placement, the nature of the placement and the effects of the placement.(2) The development of a plan that: (i) Provides for step-down units, transitional units, other similar units, programs and staffing patterns to accommodate inmates who:(A) are currently placed in segregated confinement;(B) will be placed in segregated confinement; or20250HB2059PN2643 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) receive an intermediate sanction in lieu of being placed in segregated confinement.(ii) Requires:(A) S taffing patterns for correctional facility staff and program staff to be set at levels necessary to ensure the safety of staff and inmates in accordance with this chapter.(B) Inmates placed in a step-down unit, transitional unit or other similar unit to have access to at least seven hours of daily out-of-cell group programming, recreation and activities in a group setting with other individuals in the same shared physical space without physical barriers.(3) How to r educe the need for segregated confinement. (4) How to reduce the burden of transferring inmates to a different correctional facility.(5) The establishment of nonsegregated confinement, in accordance with other State laws and other regulations promulgated by the department.(6) Easing restrictions on religious, mail and telephone privileges, visit contacts and outdoor and recreation access.(7) Prohibitions on the restriction of basic necessities during segregated confinement.(8) Training requirements for staff working with inmates in segregated confinement.(9) Standards for segregated confinement.(10) Procedures for documentation of decisions, procedures and reviews regarding segregated confinement.(11) Monitoring and compliance requirements.(12) Procedures for hearings under this chapter.20250HB2059PN2643 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5134. Additional relief.In addition to relief provided by this chapter or other State law, a person adversely affected by any act or omission of a correctional facility regarding segregated confinement in violation of this chapter may seek declarative and injunctive relief and the actual damages attributable to the violation in a court of competent jurisdiction. The court shall award reasonable expenses to the person adversely affected if the final determination by a court is in favor of the person adversely affected.SUBCHAPTER DMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.5141. Disclosure.5142. Reports.§ 5141. Disclosure.(a) Reports.--Reports prepared by correctional facilities and the department under this chapter shall be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Documentation.-- Documentation on each correctional facility's use of segregated confinement, including the reporting information provided to the department and records relating to inmates held in segregated confinement, shall be available for inspection by the applicable oversight board for each correctional facility.§ 5142. Reports.(a) Requirement.--The department shall post quarterly reports on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department regarding the use of segregated confinement.20250HB2059PN2643 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Content.--Subject to subsection (c), each report under this section must include:(1) The age, sex, gender identity, ethnicity, mental health treatment level, special accommodations or needs, pregnancy status, need for participation in substance use disorder programs and type of confinement status for each inmate who is in segregated confinement or who was in segregated confinement since the previous quarterly report.(2) The total number of inmates who are in segregated confinement or who were in segregated confinement since the previous quarterly report.(3) Since the previous quarterly report, t he total number of the following, by correctional facility:(i) Incidences of emergency segregated confinement, and segregated confinement as a result of a partial lockdown.(ii) Inmate self-harm and suicide attempts during segregated confinement.(iii) Inmate deaths during segregated confinement, including suicides, along with the number of deaths by unit, causes of death, if other than suicide, and dates of occurrence.(iv) Assaults to inmates during segregated confinement.(4) The continuous lengths of stay for each documented segregated confinement.(c) Redaction.--The department shall redact p ersonally identifiable information regarding inmates from each report under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2059PN2643 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930